Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.330

Facilities siting coordination.

The state patrol and the department of licensing shall coordinate their activities when siting facilities. This coordination shall result in the collocation of driver and vehicle licensing and vehicle inspection service facilities whenever possible.

The department and state patrol shall explore alternative state services, such as vehicle emission testing, that would be feasible to collocate in these joint facilities. The department and state patrol shall reach agreement with the department of transportation for the purposes of offering department of transportation permits at these one-stop transportation centers. All services provided at these transportation service facilities shall be provided at cost to the participating agencies.

In those instances where the community need or the agencies' needs do not warrant collocation this section shall not apply.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 23 s 46.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1993 sp.s. c 23: See note following RCW 43.89.010.